Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. Of the funds appropriated in Section 8 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 2766 of the 1st Session of the 60th Oklahoma
Legislature, One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) shall be expended
for the purpose of the Teach for America program.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby

SB1128 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON JOINT COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
AND BUDGET, dated 05/19/2025 - DO PASS, As Amended.




















SB1128 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.